Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1422.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1306-D(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. [Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.]* * *(a.2) Return of completed mail-in ballots.--The elector shall, prior to eight o'clock P.M. on election day, return the elector's completed mail-in ballot by one of the following methods only:(1) Delivery through the United States Postal Service to the offices of the elector's county board of elections.(2) Delivery in person to the permanent offices of the elector's county board of elections during its regular hours of operation.(3) Delivery to a ballot return location established under the following conditions:(i) A ballot return location may only be operated on the premises of the permanent offices of the board of elections or at the county courthouse.(ii) A ballot return location must be monitored by at least one inspector of elections from each of the two parties with the highest number of registered electors in 20250HB1422PN1654 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth. If the two inspectors of elections are unavailable to appear at a ballot return location on any particular day, a county may not operate the ballot return location. Each inspector of elections shall receive the same compensation provided for an election under this act for each day on which the inspector monitors a ballot return location.(iii) The inspectors of election monitoring a ballot return location shall verify the identification of each individual returning a ballot consistent with the provisions of this act. The inspectors of election shall also ensure review of each ballot prior to the ballot's return to ensure completeness of the declaration of the elector, signature and date. If, upon inspection and review of a ballot being returned, either inspector of election believes the ballot or its method of return to be in violation of any provision of this act, the ballot shall be secured separately from all other ballots at the ballot return location, and the inspectors of election shall record the date, time, identity of the elector and a record of each ballot being returned in potential violation of this act. The county board of elections shall determine whether the ballots are in violation of any provision of this act and, only if the county board of elections is satisfied that a ballot is not in violation, shall direct the ballot to be pre-canvassed or canvassed.(iv) A ballot return location must be monitored by video recording during hours of operation. The recording shall be made available for public inspection and 20250HB1422PN1654 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retained for a period of two years.(v) A ballot return location must be considered a polling place for all requirements of this act, including accessibility, access of observers and restriction of political activity.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1422PN1654 - 4 - 1234567